Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2 COMMODITIES
35-36-215. Inspection fees.

The commission, after conferring with interested industry groups, is authorized to fix, assess, and collect fees for the inspection of commodity handlers or small-volume commodity handlers.

For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, twenty-five percent of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this part 2 shall be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund. The inspection fee shall be paid by the person, firm, corporation, or other organization requesting the service at the time it is rendered or as otherwise provided and authorized by the commission.

All money collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 738, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-118 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-216. Bonds or irrevocable letters of credit - exemptions.

Before any license is issued to a commodity handler, the applicant shall file with the commissioner a bond executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company qualified and authorized to do business in this state as a surety or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101.5, in the sum of not less than ten thousand dollars nor more than one million dollars, at the discretion of the commissioner.

The bond or irrevocable letter of credit must be conditioned upon compliance with this part 2 and section 35-36-104 and upon the faithful and honest handling of commodities in accordance with this part 2 and section 35-36-104 and must cover any inspection fees due the department by the commodity handler and all costs and reasonable attorney fees incident to any suit upon the bond or irrevocable letter of credit. The bond or irrevocable letter of credit must be to the department in favor of every producer or owner and, in the instance of a bond, must remain in full force and effect until canceled by the surety upon thirty days' prior written notice to the commissioner.

A producer or owner within the state of Colorado claiming to be injured by the fraud, deceit, or willful negligence of, or failure to comply with this part 2 and section 35-36-104 by, a commodity handler may request the department, as beneficiary, to demand payment on the irrevocable letter of credit or surety bond to recover the damages caused by the fraud, deceit, willful negligence, or failure to comply with this part 2 and section 35-36-104.

The surety on the bond or the issuer of the letter of credit is not liable to pay any claim pursuant to an action brought under this part 2 if the action is not commenced within five hundred forty-eight days, which is approximately eighteen months, after the date of the transaction, as that term is described in section 35-36-213 (13), on which the claim is based, or the date of the loss, whichever is later.

When an action is commenced on the bond or irrevocable letter of credit, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond or irrevocable letter of credit, and the commodity handler's failure to file the new bond or irrevocable letter of credit within ten days after the commencement of the action constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation of the commodity handler's license.

A person licensed pursuant to part 3 of this article 36 may apply for a license as a commodity handler and is not subject to the license fee required by section 35-36-203. The bond or irrevocable letter of credit required by section 35-36-304 applies to the person's activities as a commodity handler and is subject to this section and section 35-36-213.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a previously approved bond or irrevocable letter of credit is or for any cause has become insufficient, the commissioner may require that a commodity handler provide an additional bond or irrevocable letter of credit or other evidence of financial responsibility to conform to the requirements of this part 2 and section 35-36-104 or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article 36 regarding commodity handlers. The commodity handler's failure to comply with the commissioner's requirement within thirty days after written demand for compliance constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation of the commodity handler's license.

This section does not apply to small-volume commodity handlers.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 738, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-119 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-217. Unlawful acts - definition.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 2 for a person to:

Make fraudulent charges or returns for the handling, sale, or storage or for the rendering of any service in connection with the handling, sale, or storage of any commodities. Violation of this subsection (1)(a) is a class 6 felony.

Willfully fail or refuse to render a true account of sales or storage or to make a settlement on sales or storage or to pay for commodities received on the date and in the manner specified in the contract with the owner or, if no date is specified in the contract or on delivery, within thirty days after the date of delivery or the date on which the person took possession of the commodities. Violation of this subsection (1)(b) is a class 6 felony.

Intentionally make false or misleading statements as to the market conditions for commodities or false or misleading statements as to the condition, quality, or quantity of commodities received, handled, sold, or stored. Violation of this subsection (1)(c) is a class 6 felony.

Engage in fictitious sales, in collusion, or in unfair practices to defraud the owners. Violation of this subsection (1)(d) is a class 6 felony.

Act as a commodity handler without having obtained a license or act as a commodity handler without having filed a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit, as provided in this part 2. Violation of this subsection (1)(e) is a class 6 felony.

Willfully convert to the person's own use or benefit the commodities of another. Violation of this subsection (1)(f) is theft, as defined in section 18-4-401.

Commit fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of a license. Violation of this subsection (1)(g) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Fail to comply with any lawful order of the commissioner concerning the administration of this part 2. Violation of this subsection (1)(h) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Interfere with or hinder an authorized representative of the department while performing the person's duties under this part 2. Violation of this subsection (1)(i) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Willfully alter or destroy any negotiable warehouse receipt or the record of the negotiable warehouse receipt; issue a negotiable warehouse receipt without preserving a record of the negotiable warehouse receipt; issue a negotiable warehouse receipt when the commodity described is not in the building certified in the receipt; with intent to defraud, issue a second or other negotiable warehouse receipt for any commodity for which, or for any part of which, a valid negotiable warehouse receipt is already outstanding and in force; or, while a valid negotiable warehouse receipt is outstanding and in force, sell, pledge, mortgage, encumber, or transfer a commodity in violation of this part 2 or section 35-36-104 or permit the same to be done without the written consent of the holder of the negotiable warehouse receipt or receive the property or help to dispose of the property. Violation of this subsection (1)(j) is a class 6 felony.

Sell commodities for less than the current market price to a person with whom the person has any financial connection, directly or indirectly, either as an owner of the corporate stock of a corporation, as a copartner, or in any other capacity, or sell any commodities out of the purchase price of which the commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler, directly or indirectly, retains any portion of the purchase price other than the commission allowed and reported pursuant to section 35-36-310. Violation of this subsection (1)(k) constitutes theft, as defined in section 18-4-401.

Act as a commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler and, with intent to defraud, make, draw, utter, or deliver any check, draft, or order for the payment of money upon a bank or other depository to the owner for the purchase price of any commodities or any part of the purchase price upon obtaining possession or control of the commodities, when, at the time of the making, drawing, uttering, or delivery, the maker or drawer has insufficient funds in or credit with the bank or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order in full upon its presentation. The making, drawing, uttering, or delivery of the check, draft, or order is prima facie evidence of an intent to defraud. "Credit", as used in this subsection (1)(l), means an arrangement or understanding with the bank or depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order. Violation of this subsection (1)(l) is fraud by check, as defined in section 18-5-205.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 739, § 2, effective June 29. 35-36-217

L. 2021:

(1)(g), (1)(h), and (1)(i) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3280, § 633, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-123 as it existed prior to 2020.